Utah statutes.
26-6-12.   Rabies or other animal disease -- Investigation following order of quarantine.

Following the order of quarantine the department shall make a thorough investigation as to the extent of the disease, the probable number of persons and beasts exposed, and the area involved.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 1981 General Session

